Hawaii statutes.
[§342G-29] Revisions to the state
integrated solid waste management plan. (a) The office shall be
responsible for preparing revisions to the state integrated solid waste
management plan. The first revision shall be completed within six months of
the date that all four initial county plans have been approved by the office.
The office shall complete each additional state revised plan within six months
of the date that all four county revised plans have been approved by the
office.

(b) For each state revised plan, the office
shall convene a state integrated solid waste management task force. The office
shall involve the task force in the review of the county plans and the
development of the state revised plan.

(c) For each state revised plan, the office
shall:

(1) Revise and update the material contained in the
previous plan or revised plan; and

(2) With comment from the task force, address other
issues of statewide concern regarding integrated solid waste management. [L
1991, c 324, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next